Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0712.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 8501. (1) In a county that elects by itself fewer than 2
district judges, the county board of commissioners shall provide
for 1 district court magistrate. In all other counties in districts
of the first and second class, the county board of commissioners
shall provide for not less than 1 magistrate if recommended by the
judges of the district. Additional magistrates may be provided by
the board upon recommendation of the judges. All magistrates
SCS S02666'25 (S-2) k23j7v


provided for shall must be appointed by the judges of the district
and the appointments shall be are subject to approval by the county
board of commissioners before a person an individual assumes the
duties of the office of magistrate.
(2) In each district of the third class, the judge or judges
of the district may appoint 1 or more district court magistrates. A
person shall not be appointed magistrate unless the person is a
registered elector in the district for which the person was
appointed or in an adjoining district if the appointment is made
under a plan of concurrent jurisdiction adopted under chapter 4.
Before a person an individual assumes the duties of the office of
magistrate in a district of the third class, the appointment of
that person individual as a district court magistrate is subject to
approval by the governing body or bodies of the district control
unit or units that, individually or in the aggregate, contain more
than 50% of the population of the district. This subsection does
not apply to the thirty-sixth district.
(3) Until the effective date of the amendatory act that added
this subsection, an individual must not be appointed as a district
court magistrate under subsection (1) or (2) unless the individual
is a registered elector in the district for which the individual
would be appointed or in an adjoining district as that term is
defined in subsection (6)(a). Beginning on the effective date of
the amendatory act that added this subsection, an individual must
not be appointed as a district court magistrate under subsection
(1) or (2) unless the individual resides in the district to which
the individual would be appointed or in an adjoining district.
(4) (3) The thirty-sixth district shall must not have not more
than 6 district court magistrates. The chief judge of the thirty-
SCS S02666'25 (S-2) k23j7v


sixth district may appoint 1 or more magistrates as permitted by
this subsection. If a vacancy occurs in the office of district
court magistrate, the chief judge may appoint a successor. Each
magistrate appointed under this subsection shall serve serves at
the pleasure of the chief judge of the thirty-sixth district.
(5) (4) A person shall An individual must not be appointed as
a district court magistrate under subsection (3) (4) unless the
person individual is a registered elector in the district or in an
adjoining district if the appointment is made under a plan of
concurrent jurisdiction adopted under chapter 4.as that term is
defined in subsection (6)(a).
(6) For the purpose of this section, "adjoining district"
means a district in this state of the first, second, or third class
that is either of the following:
(a) In a plan of concurrent jurisdiction adopted under chapter
4 with the district to which the individual would be appointed.
(b) Shares a border with the district to which the individual
would be appointed.
Sec. 8507. (1) Magistrates shall be registered electors in the
county in which they are appointed. A magistrate is appointed
pursuant to section 8501. All magistrates appointed shall serve at
the pleasure of the judges of the district court. Before assuming
office, persons appointed magistrates shall a magistrate must take
the constitutional oath of office and file a bond with the
treasurer of a district funding unit of that district in an amount
determined by the state court administrator. The bond shall also
apply applies to temporary service in another county under
subsection (2), (3), or (4), or pursuant to authorized by a
multiple district plan under subsection (5).
SCS S02666'25 (S-2) k23j7v


(2) In a district of the first class that consists of more
than 1 county, if a magistrate is temporarily absent or
incapacitated, the chief or only district judge may direct issue a
written order to a magistrate of another county of the same
district to serve temporarily in the county where the magistrate is
temporarily absent or incapacitated. The district judge shall make
his or her order in writing. A magistrate serving temporarily under
this subsection is not entitled to additional compensation but,
shall on certification and approval by the state court
administrator, must be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses
incurred during the authorized temporary service. upon
certification and approval by the state court administrator. Upon
allowance, On approval, the reimbursement shall must be paid by the
state treasurer out of the appropriation for the state court
administrative office.
(3) In a district of the first class that consists of more
than 1 county, the chief or only district judge may authorize a
magistrate appointed in 1 county to serve in another county in the
district.
(4) Pursuant to Under a multiple district plan created under
section 8320 involving adjoining districts of the first class, a
district court magistrate appointed in a county of 1 district may
be authorized to serve in a county of the adjoining district. While
serving in the adjoining district, the magistrate shall be is
subject to the superintending control of the chief or only district
judge of that district.
(5) Pursuant to Under a multiple district plan created under
section 8320 involving districts in the same county, a district
court magistrate may be authorized to serve in any participating
SCS S02666'25 (S-2) k23j7v


district of the county.
Final Page
SCS S02666'25 (S-2) k23j7v